Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-210
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed
document.

(MBCA
1.27) A certificate from the Secretary of State delivered with a copy of a
document filed by the Secretary of State, is conclusive evidence that the
original document is on file with the Secretary of State.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 10.
January 1, 2017